Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 2 INTELLECTUAL AND DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
25.5-10-207.5. Strategic plan for long- term services and supports - joint hearing - appropriation - reporting - legislative declaration - rules.

The general assembly finds that:

Colorado has a long commitment to supporting persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities in communities of their choosing;

Coloradans with intellectual and developmental disabilities who are eligible for state services and supports should be able to access services and supports in a timely manner to allow them to benefit from those services and supports and lead lives that build on their independence;

Providing early and timely access to services and supports for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities is an excellent and cost-effective investment that results in substantial future savings;

The presence of a waiting list as long as fifteen years for essential services and supports contradicts Colorado's commitment to supporting persons in the least restrictive environment of their choosing;

Colorado must have accurate data concerning the need for services and supports for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities and their families and must regularly forecast this data to ensure that effective policy and programs are directed to meet these needs;

The waiting list includes persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities who are at risk of experiencing a crisis due to the advanced age, reduced capacity, and illness of their caregivers;

After a lifetime of providing continuous support, these caregivers deserve the comfort of knowing that their loved one will have needed services and supports; and

Persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities and their caregivers should not have to experience a crisis before getting needed assistance, as each crisis puts undue hardship and strain on the person and caregiver, and the services system.

Therefore, the general assembly declares that Colorado is committed to developing a strategic plan to ensure that Coloradans with intellectual and developmental disabilities and their families will be able to access the services and supports they need and want at the time that they need and want those services and supports.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2) is effective until July 1, 2024.] During each regular session of the general assembly, the joint budget committee and the health and human services committees of the senate and the house of representatives, or any successor committees, shall hold a joint hearing and take public testimony on the status of the waiting lists for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities who are waiting for enrollment into a home- and community-based services program or a program provided pursuant to this article 10 and the availability of general fund money to reduce the number of persons on the waiting lists and the amount of time eligible persons wait for such services. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the state department shall present testimony, including the information provided in the report pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, as well as information concerning the ongoing implementation of the strategic plan required pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, including any revisions to the strategic plan. Additionally, the state department, community-centered boards, and providers shall report on the use and effectiveness of any money appropriated in the preceding state fiscal year for increasing system capacity. The goal of the hearing is to propose an appropriation from the general fund to the intellectual and developmental disabilities services cash fund.

(2)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (2) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

During each regular session of the general assembly, the joint budget committee and the health and human services committees of the senate and the house of representatives, or any successor committees, shall hold a joint hearing and take public testimony on the status of the waiting lists for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities who are waiting for enrollment into a home- and community-based services program or a program provided pursuant to this article 10 and the availability of general fund money to reduce the number of persons on the waiting lists and the amount of time eligible persons wait for such services. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), the state department shall present testimony, including the information provided in the report pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, as well as information concerning the ongoing implementation of the strategic plan required pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, including any revisions to the strategic plan. Additionally, the state department, case management agencies, and providers shall report on the use and effectiveness of any money appropriated in the preceding state fiscal year for increasing system capacity. The goal of the hearing is to propose an appropriation from the general fund to the intellectual and developmental disabilities services cash fund.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), on or before November 1, 2014, and November 1 of each year thereafter, in accordance with section 24-1-136 (9), the state department shall report to the general assembly the total number of persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities who are waiting at the time of the report for enrollment into a home- and community-based services program or a program provided pursuant to this article 10. The report must also include information concerning the ongoing implementation of the strategic plan required pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, including any revisions to the strategic plan.

The information reported pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (3) relating to persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities who are waiting for enrollment into a home- and community-based services program or a program provided pursuant to this article shall be disaggregated by:

The specific medicaid waiver program or other intellectual and developmental disabilities program, service, or support;

The persons who need services immediately but who are not currently receiving services;

The persons who need services immediately who are currently receiving some services; and

The persons who are eligible for services but who do not need services at this time.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (4)(a) is effective until July 1, 2024.] On or before November 1, 2014, the state department shall develop, in consultation with intellectual and developmental disability system stakeholders, a comprehensive strategic plan including administrative procedures and adequate funding to enroll eligible persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities into home- and community-based services programs and programs provided pursuant to this article at the time those persons choose to enroll in the programs or need the services or supports. As part of developing the strategic plan, the state department shall review the statutory definition of "waiting list" set forth in section 25.5-10-202 and make recommendations concerning amendments to the definition. In engaging stakeholders, the state department shall include both persons and families receiving services, as well as persons and families waiting for enrollment into programs, services, or supports. These persons and families shall include, at a minimum, persons and families who reside in each community-centered, board-designated service area within the state. In developing the strategic plan, the state department shall review relevant recommendations from the community living advisory group created in the office pursuant to the governor's executive order D 2012-027, as well as other relevant information. The strategic plan shall include specific recommendations and annual benchmarks for achieving this enrollment goal by July 1, 2020, including recommendations relating to increasing system capacity. The state department shall review the strategic plan annually and revise the plan as needed to meet the enrollment goal. Nothing in this section precludes the state department from considering changes in the structure of the state's intellectual and developmental disabilities programs, including medicaid waiver modification.

(4)

(a) [Editor's note: This version of subsection (4)(a) is effective July 1, 2024.] On or before November 1, 2014, the state department shall develop, in consultation with intellectual and developmental disability system stakeholders, a comprehensive strategic plan including administrative procedures and adequate funding to enroll eligible persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities into home- and community-based services programs and programs provided pursuant to this article 10 at the time those persons choose to enroll in the programs or need the services or supports. As part of developing the strategic plan, the state department shall review the statutory definition of "waiting list" set forth in section 25.5-10-202 and make recommendations concerning amendments to the definition. In engaging stakeholders, the state department shall include both persons and families receiving services, as well as persons and families waiting for enrollment into programs, services, or supports. These persons and families must include, at a minimum, persons and families who reside in each defined service area within the state. In developing the strategic plan, the state department shall review relevant recommendations from the community living advisory group created in the office pursuant to the governor's executive order D 2012-027, as well as other relevant information. The strategic plan must include specific recommendations and annual benchmarks for achieving this enrollment goal by July 1, 2020, including recommendations relating to increasing system capacity. The state department shall review the strategic plan annually and revise the plan as needed to meet the enrollment goal. Nothing in this section precludes the state department from considering changes in the structure of the state's intellectual and developmental disabilities programs, including medicaid waiver modification.

The state department shall submit the strategic plan to the general assembly in accordance with section 24-1-136 (9), C.R.S., and shall present the strategic plan to the joint budget committee on or before December 1, 2014.

In its annual submission of the state department's budget request to the joint budget committee, the governor's office of state planning and budgeting shall reference the number of persons who are waiting at the time of the November 1 report for enrollment into a home- and community-based services program or a program provided pursuant to this article and shall indicate to the joint budget committee those budget requests related specifically to achieving the enrollment goal set forth in the strategic plan required pursuant to this section.

Subject to the availability of reserve capacity enrollment, a person with an intellectual and developmental disability who is on the waiting list for services and who is at risk of experiencing an emergency due to any of the criteria included in subsection (6)(b) of this section and who meets other applicable criteria for enrollment established by the state board shall be offered enrollment into the home- and community-based services developmental disabilities waiver using a person-centered transition process.

No later than June 1, 2019, the state board shall promulgate rules regarding the criteria for reserve capacity enrollments for those persons described in subsection (6)(a) of this section, which criteria must include but is not limited to:

The age of the custodial parent or caregiver;

The loss of the custodial parent or caregiver;

Incapacitation of the custodial parent or caregiver;

Any life-threatening or serious persistent illness of the custodial parent or caregiver; and

A threat to health or safety that the custodial parent or caregiver places on the person with intellectual and developmental disabilities.

As part of the rule-making process for reserve capacity enrollment pursuant to subsection (6)(b) of this section, the state board shall solicit feedback from persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities and family members of persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities.

During the state fiscal year beginning July 1, 2018, the state department shall initiate three hundred nonemergency enrollments from the waiting list for the home- and community-based services developmental disabilities waiver.

Beginning July 2018, and continuing monthly thereafter, the state department shall include in its monthly premiums, expenditures, and caseload report the number of persons who were moved off the developmental disabilities waiting list, specifying the enrollments initiated under the order of selection and the enrollments initiated under the reserve capacity criteria.

Source:

L. 2014:

Entire section added, (HB 14-1051), ch. 33, p. 184, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2017:

(2) and (3)(a) amended, (HB 17-1060), ch. 6, p. 17, § 10, effective November 2.

L. 2018:

(1)(a)(IV) amended and (1)(a)(VI), (1)(a)(VII), (1)(a)(VIII), (6), (7), and (8) added, (HB 18-1407), ch. 248, p. 1531, § 3, effective May 24.

L. 2021:

(2) and (4)(a) amended, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 341, § 43, effective July 1, 2024.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) is similar to former § 25.5-10-207 (2) as it existed prior to 2014.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1407, see section 1 of chapter 248, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

25.5-10-208. Service agencies and case management agencies - money - rules - repeal.

A service agency and a case management agency shall comply with the requirements set forth in this article 10 and the rules promulgated thereunder.

[Editor's note: This version of the introductory portion to subsection (2) is effective until July 1, 2024.] The state board shall promulgate rules to implement the purchase of services and supports from a community-centered board, service agency, case management agency, or family caregiver. The rules must include, but need not be limited to:

(2)

[

Editor's note: This version the introductory portion to subsection (2) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

The state board shall promulgate rules to implement the purchase of long-term services and supports from a service agency, case management agency, or family caregiver. The rules must include, but need not be limited to:

Terms and conditions necessary to promote the effective delivery of services and supports, including those services and supports delivered by a family caregiver;

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(b) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Procedures for obtaining an annual audit of designated community-centered boards, case management agencies, and service agencies to provide financial information deemed necessary by the state department to establish costs of services and supports and to ensure proper management of money received pursuant to section 25.5-10-206;

(b)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(b) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Procedures for obtaining an annual audit of case management agencies and service agencies to provide financial information deemed necessary by the state department to establish costs of long-term services and supports and to ensure proper management of money received pursuant to section 25.5-10-206;

Delineation of a system to resolve contractual disputes between the state department and designated community-centered boards, service agencies, or case management agencies, and between designated community-centered boards and service agencies, including the contesting of any rates that the designated community-centered boards charge to service agencies based upon a percentage of the rates that service agencies charge for services and supports;

This subsection (2)(c) is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(d) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Specification of which services and supports are to be reimbursed by the state department and secondarily by the community-centered board, the source of reimbursement, actual service or support costs, incentives, and program service objectives that affect reimbursement;

(d)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(d) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Specification of which long-term services and supports are to be reimbursed by the state department and secondarily by the case management agency, the source of reimbursement, actual long-term service or support costs, incentives, and program service objectives that affect reimbursement;

The methods of coordinating the purchase of services and supports, including but not limited to service and support coordination, with other federal, state, and local programs that provide funding for authorized services and supports; and

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(f) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Criteria for and limitations on any rates that designated community-centered boards charge to service agencies based upon a percentage of the rates that service agencies charge for services and supports.

(f)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (2)(f) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Criteria for and limitations on any rates that case management agencies charge to service agencies based upon a percentage of the rates that service agencies charge for long-term services and supports.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (3) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Any incorporated service agency that is registered in Colorado as a foreign corporation shall organize a local advisory board consisting of persons who reside within the designated service area. Such advisory board shall be representative of the community at large and persons receiving services and their families.

(3)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (3) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Any incorporated service agency that is registered in Colorado as a foreign corporation shall organize a local advisory board consisting of persons who reside within the defined service area. The advisory board shall be representative of the community at large and persons receiving services and their families.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (4) is effective until July 1, 2024.] Upon a determination by the executive director that services or supports have not been provided in accordance with the program or financial administration standards specified in this article 10 and the rules promulgated thereunder, the executive director may reduce, suspend, or withhold payment to a designated community-centered board, case management agency, service agency under contract with a designated community-centered board, or service agency from which the state department purchased services or supports directly. When the executive director decides to reduce, suspend, or withhold payment, the executive director shall specify the reasons therefor and the actions that are necessary to bring the designated community-centered board, case management agency, or service agency into compliance.

(4)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (4) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

Upon a determination by the executive director that services or supports have not been provided in accordance with the program or financial administration standards specified in this article 10 and the rules promulgated thereunder, the executive director may reduce, suspend, or withhold payment to a case management agency or service agency under contract with a case management agency, or service agency from which the state department purchased long-term services or supports directly. When the executive director decides to reduce, suspend, or withhold payment, the executive director shall specify the reasons therefor and the actions that are necessary to bring the case management agency or service agency into compliance.

Nothing in this article or in any rules promulgated pursuant thereto and no actions taken by the executive director pursuant to this article shall be construed to affect the obtaining of funds from local authorities, including those funds obtained from a mill levy assessed by a county or municipality for the purpose of purchasing services or supports for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities, or to require that such funds from local authorities be used to supplant state or federal funds available for purchasing services and supports for persons with developmental disabilities.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1758, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

L. 2017:

(1), IP(2), (2)(b), (2)(c), and (4) amended, (HB 17-1343), ch. 320, p. 1724, § 5, effective June 5.

L. 2021:

IP(2), (2)(b), (2)(d), (2)(f), (3), and (4) amended, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 342, § 44, effective July 1, 2024; (2)(c)(II) added by revision, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, pp. 342, 354, §§ 44, 70.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-104.5 as it existed prior to 2013.

25.5-10-209. Community-centered boards - designation - purchase of services and supports - performance audits - Colorado local government audit law - public disclosure of board administration and operations - repeal.

In order to be designated as the community-centered board in a particular designated service area, a private for-profit or not-for-profit corporation shall annually apply for such designation to the state department in the form and manner specified by the executive director. Designation shall be based on the following factors:

Utilization of existing service agencies or existing social networks or natural sources of support in the designated service area;

Encouragement of competition among service agencies within the designated service area to provide newly identified services or supports, the variety of service agencies available to the person receiving services within the designated service area, and the demonstrated effort to purchase new or expanded services or supports from service agencies other than those affiliated with the community-centered board;

Utilization of state-funded services and supports administered at the local level, including but not limited to public education, social services, public health, and rehabilitation programs;

Quality of services and supports provided directly or by contract for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities;

The establishment of new services and supports for the prevention of institutionalization, the support of deinstitutionalization, and a commitment to innovative, effective, and inclusive services and supports for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities; and

The willingness of the applicant to pursue authorized services and supports from all eligible persons within the designated service area.

Once a community-centered board has been designated pursuant to this section, it shall, subject to available appropriations:

Be under the control and direction of a board of directors or trustees composed of one or more persons from each of the following categories:

Interested persons representing the community at large;

Family members of persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities who are receiving services or supports; and

Persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities who are receiving services or supports;

Adopt by-law provisions to ensure that:

Members of the governing board are prohibited from voting on issues in which they have a conflict of interest;

Staff members of the community-centered board and employees or board members of service agencies may not serve on the governing board;

Staff members of the community-centered board and employees or board members of service agencies are prohibited from voting in elections for members of the governing board; and

Board meetings must be scheduled after adequate notice and must be open to the public; except that, by vote of a two-thirds majority of members present, the board may elect to address the following matters in executive session:

The purchase, acquisition, lease, transfer, or sale of any real, personal, or other property interest;

Conferences with an attorney for the purpose of receiving legal advice on specific legal questions;

Matters required to be kept confidential by federal or state law or rules;

Specialized details of security arrangements or investigations;

Determining positions relative to matters that may be subject to negotiations;

Developing strategy for negotiations and instructing negotiators; and

Personnel matters;

Determine the needs of eligible persons within the community-centered board designated service area and prepare and implement a long-range plan and annual updates to that plan for the development and coordination of services and supports to address those needs. The needs determination and designated service area plans or annual update shall be submitted to the state department.

Determine eligibility and develop an individualized plan for each person who receives services or supports pursuant to section 25.5-10-211; except that, for a child from birth through two years of age, eligibility determination and development of an individualized family service plan are made pursuant to the provisions of part 4 of article 3 of title 26.5;

Provide case management services and periodic reviews pursuant to section 25.5-10-211, for persons receiving services and families with children with intellectual and developmental disabilities or delays;

Obtain or provide early intervention services and supports pursuant to the provisions of part 4 of article 3 of title 26.5;

Take steps to notify eligible persons, and their families as appropriate, regarding the availability of services and supports; and

Establish a human rights committee. The human rights committee is composed, to the extent possible, of two professional persons trained in the application of behavior development techniques and three representatives of persons receiving services, their parents, legal guardians, or authorized representatives. An employee or board member of a service agency within the community-centered board's designated service area shall not serve as a member of the human rights committee.

The executive director shall review each designated community-centered board program to ensure that the program complies with the requirements and standards set forth in this article and the rules promulgated thereunder.

The state auditor shall conduct or cause to be conducted a performance audit that includes each community-centered board that receives more than seventy-five percent of its funding on an annual basis from the federal, the state, or a local government or from any combination of such governmental entities to determine whether such board is effectively and efficiently fulfilling its statutory obligations. A community-centered board becomes subject to the audit requirement under this subsection (4) at such time as the board initially satisfies the seventy-five percent funding requirement for any one year regardless of whether or not the funding level decreases below seventy-five percent in any subsequent year. Any performance audit that is required to be conducted under this subsection (4) must be completed in the first five-year period following August 10, 2016. Thereafter, a performance audit may be conducted of such community-centered boards described in this subsection (4) if requested by the state auditor in the exercise of his or her discretion. The state auditor shall submit a written report and recommendations on each audit conducted under this subsection (4) and shall present the report and recommendations to the legislative audit committee created in section 2-3-101 (1), C.R.S. The state auditor shall pay the costs of any performance audit conducted pursuant to this section.

Each community-centered board is subject to the requirements of the "Colorado Local Government Audit Law", part 6 of article 1 of title 29, C.R.S.

In connection with the board of directors of each community-centered board, in addition to any other requirements applicable to the operation of the board of directors pursuant to this section or as required elsewhere by law:

The community-centered board shall post the date, time, and location of each regularly scheduled meeting of its board of directors on the website of the community-centered board not less than fourteen business days prior to the date of the meeting. The community-centered board shall post on the website of the community-centered board the date, time, and location of any special or emergency meeting of the board of directors not less than twenty-four hours before the meeting.

Each community-centered board shall post the agenda for each meeting of its board of directors on the website of the community-centered board not less than seven business days prior to the date of the meeting. The community-centered board shall post on the website of the community-centered board the agenda of any special or emergency meeting of the board of directors not less than twenty-four hours before the meeting. Each meeting of the board must allow for public comment, and the agenda must reflect this requirement. Public comment must be reasonably permitted during the board meeting to accommodate community needs. Any documents related to functions of the community-centered board to be distributed at a meeting of the board of directors that are available for public dissemination at the time the agenda is posted must also be posted on the website of the community-centered board at the time the agenda is posted, and written copies of such documents must be made available for public dissemination at the board meeting; except that, the posting requirement specified in this paragraph (b) does not apply to any document, or any portion of such document, the disclosure of which requires the approval of the board of directors and which approval has not been obtained as of the time the agenda is posted or any other document, or any portion of such document, containing any information that is legally prohibited from being disclosed to the public pursuant to the privacy requirements specified in the health insurance portability and accountability act, any document that has been or will be discussed by the board of directors meeting in executive session, or any other document the disclosure of which is otherwise prohibited by law.

Each community-centered board shall provide a direct e-mail address to each member of its board of directors on the website of the community-centered board. The e-mail address selected must specify the name of the individual board member and make reference to the particular community-centered board for which he or she serves as a member of the board of directors. An e-mail that is sent to a member of the board of directors of a community-centered board shall not be filtered by the community-centered board through an employee of the community-centered board before it is sent to the member of the board of directors.

The board of directors of each community-centered board shall present the financial statements of the corporation for the approval of the board at each regularly scheduled meeting of the board of directors. The financial statements must reflect accurate and current financial information and be prepared using generally accepted accounting principles. Where exigent circumstances are present that materially affect the preparation of the financial statements on a monthly basis, such statements may be presented for the approval of the board of directors at the next regularly scheduled meeting of the board but not less than at least once each quarter of the calendar year.

Each community-centered board shall require the person or entity that performs financial audits of the community-centered board to present and discuss the results of the audit to the board of directors not less than once each year at a regularly scheduled meeting of the board of directors.

Each community-centered board shall provide to the incoming members of its board of directors training in such topics as the duties of a board member, the financial and fiduciary responsibilities assumed by board members, the intellectual and developmental disability system in the state, the overall business functions of the community-centered board, and any other matters that will, in the determination of the community-centered board, allow the board member to better understand and fulfill his or her obligations to the board of directors and the community-centered board and the role played by community-centered boards in the state in connection with the delivery of services for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities.

Each community-centered board shall post on the website of the community-centered board the minutes of each meeting of its board of directors as such minutes are approved by the board of directors. Each community-centered board shall also post on the website of the community-centered board any additional documents that were distributed to the board at such meeting that were not, as of that date, already posted on the website of the community-centered board unless the public distribution of such documents, or any portion of such documents, is otherwise prohibited pursuant to the privacy requirements specified in the health insurance portability and accountability act or as otherwise prohibited by law. Minutes of special meetings of the board of directors must be posted after approval by the board of the same at the board's next regular meeting.

With respect to financial information concerning the community-centered board, each community-centered board shall:

Post the following on the website of the community-centered board in a place on the website that allows access to the public in a clear, accessible, easily operated, and uncomplicated manner:

Each completed financial audit undertaken of the community-centered board not later than thirty days following acceptance by the corporation's board of directors of the audit; and

The most current form 990 the community-centered board has filed with the federal internal revenue service not later than thirty days following filing of the form with the internal revenue service.

Make the following information available upon reasonable request not later than five business days after the request is made:

The annual budget of the community-centered board for each calendar or fiscal year, as applicable, not later than thirty days after final approval of the budget by the board of directors of the community-centered board;

An annual summary of all revenues and expenditures of the community-centered board as have been appropriated by the state concerning capacity building, family support services, state general fund supported living services, and state general fund early intervention that is calculated by September 30 of each year for the prior year, as applicable; and

A description of the policies and procedures it follows to track, manage, and report its financial resources and transactions, which policies and procedures are also known and may be referred to as its "financial controls".

Any contract that each community-centered board enters into on or after August 10, 2016, with either the department of health care policy and financing created in section 25.5-1-104 (1) or the department of human services created in section 26-1-105, C.R.S., must be posted on the website of the community-centered board in a place on the website that allows access to the public in a clear, accessible, easily operated, and uncomplicated manner not later than thirty days following approval of the contract by the board of directors of the community-centered board.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2024.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1760, § 1, effective March 1, 2014.

L. 2016:

(4), (5), (6), (7), and (8) added, (SB 16-038), ch. 199, p. 702, § 2, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

(2)(e) amended, (HB 17-1343), ch. 320, p. 1725, § 6, effective June 5.

L. 2021:

(9) added by revision, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, pp. 353, 354, §§ 69, 70.

L. 2022:

(2)(d) and (2)(f) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 848, § 77, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-10.5-105 as it existed prior to 2013.

Cross references:

(1) For the federal "Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996", (HIPAA), see 42 U.S.C. sec. 1320d et seq.

(2) For the legislative declaration in SB 16-038, see section 1 of chapter 199, Session Laws of Colorado 2016.